src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! # Livonian morphophonology

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-liv/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! We first show alphabet and sets, thereafter rules.


!! ## Alphabet

Alphabet
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z  !!= * @CODE@ 
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z  !!= * @CODE@ 
ḑ ļ ņ ŗ š ț ž									     !!= * @CODE@ 
Ḑ Ļ Ņ Ŗ Š Ț Ž									     !!= * @CODE@ 
õ ä ö ȯ											     !!= * @CODE@ 
Õ Ä Ö Ȯ											     !!= * @CODE@ 
ā ē ī ō ū ǟ ǭ ȭ ȱ								     !!= * @CODE@ 
Ā Ē Ī Ō Ū Ǟ Ǭ Ȭ Ȱ								     !!= * @CODE@ 
ʼ !! * ʼ Stød

! loosening the rule to allow ǭ:ō 2013-06-26
!ǭ:ō
!Ǭ:Ō These are dealt with in filters 2020-10-22

!! ### Literal quotes and angles
!! They must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):

 »7     !! »7
 «7     !! «7
 %[%>%] !!= @CODE@ - Literal >
 %[%<%] !!= @CODE@ - Literal <

!! ### Archiphonemes for consonant lengthening

%{XC%}:p %{XC%}:t %{XC%}:k		      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:b %{XC%}:d %{XC%}:g		      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:l %{XC%}:ļ				      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:m %{XC%}:n %{XC%}:ņ		      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:r %{XC%}:ŗ				      !!= * @CODE@
%{XC%}:š %{XC%}:v %{XC%}:z %{XC%}:ž   !!= * @CODE@

!! ###  Triggers

 %^PenVV2V:0 !!= * @CODE@ penultimate vowel shortening
 %^Tense:0 !!= * @CODE@ = Tense stem will have stød if proper stem type
 %^D2T:0   !!= * @CODE@ d:t veʼž:veʼd:vietā
 %^PreI:0  !!= * @CODE@ i:0 veʼž:veʼd:vietā
 %^ĪE2Ē:0  !!= * @CODE@ kēļ kīel
K1:k       !!= * @CODE@ this k is not effected by gradation
%^NoGrad:0 !!= * @CODE@  This will be placed after a stem to break Gradation
%^WGStem:0 !!= * @CODE@ this weakens the stem ompel to ommel
%^TS:0     !!= * @CODE@ The ti => si
%^D2Ž:0    !!= * @CODE@ The *ti => *si
%^D2ZERO:0 !!= * @CODE@ The d => 0

!! ###  Vowel raising
%^LowerVows:0 !!= * @CODE@ lower vowel
%^RVows:0     !!= * @CODE@ raise vowel
%^VowsSh1:0   !!= * @CODE@ vowel shortening in first syllable
%^VowsShU1:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^VowsShI1:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^DiphthSh1:0 !!= * @CODE@ 
%^VowsLI1:0   !!= * @CODE@ vowel lengthening that is followed by "i" when short
%^VowsLU1:0   !!= * @CODE@ vowel lengthening that is followed by "u" when short
%^VowsL1:0    !!= * @CODE@ vowel lengthening 
%^DiphthL1:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^LongV2Õin2:0   !!= * @CODE@ long vowel to õ in second syllable
%^Vow2Iin2:0   !!= * @CODE@ vowel to i or ī in second syllable

!! ### Vowel metathesis
%^VowsMetath:0   !!= * @CODE@

!! ### VOWEL SHORTENING
 %^VowShIn1:0	!!= * @CODE@ This causes vowel shortening in 1. syll
                !!= * @CODE@ accompanied by coda consonant lengthening
 %^A2ÕIn2:0       !!= * @CODE@ This causes 2. syll a => õ
%^StodRM:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^ConsSh:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^ConsL:0 !!  * @CODE@ lengthen consonant
%^1Sh2L:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^Stress1to2:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^Stress2to1:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^VowsMRM:0 !!≈ * @CODE@ Vow in middle ētam:eitmõd
%^VowsRM:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^ConsRM:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^PalatalizeLeft:0 !!  * @CODE@ laps:läpš
%^VowsL1aToǭ:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
%^VowsõToi:0 !! * @CODE@ kīndõr:kīndiriž
%- !!  * @CODE@ Hyphen in  constructions 
%> !!  * @CODE@ morpheme boundary
#   !!  * @CODE@ Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds

;


!! ## Sets

Sets

VowBack = a o u A O U ;											   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowFront = ä ö y ü Ä Ö Y Ü ;									   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowNeutral = e i E I ; 											   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowNonHigh = a o ä ö e A O Ä Ö E ;								   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowLong  = ā ō ū ǟ ǭ ȭ ȱ ȫ ȳ ǖ ē ī Ā Ō Ū Ǟ Ǭ Ȭ Ȱ Ȫ Ȳ Ǖ Ē Ī ;	   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
VowShort = a o u ä ǫ õ ȯ ö y ü e i A O U Ä Ǫ Õ Ȯ Ö Y Ü E I ;	   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
Vow = VowLong VowShort ;										   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
CnsWithStod = b d g j l ļ m n ņ r ŗ v z ž ;						   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
Cns = b c č d ḑ f g ģ h j k ķ l ļ m n ņ p q r ŗ s š t ț v z ž 	   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
      B C Č D Ḑ F G Ģ H J K Ķ L Ļ M N Ņ P Q R Ŗ S Š T Ț V Z Ž ;	   !!≈   @CODE@ 
Letters = Vow Cns ;												   !!≈ * @CODE@ 
Dummy = %^ConsSh %^ConsL %^LowerVows %^PalatalizeLeft %^PenVV2V    !!≈ * @CODE@ 
  %^StodRM %^Stress1to2 %^VowsLI1 %^VowsSh1 %^VowShIn1 %^VowsRM ;  !!≈   @CODE@ 

!Definitions
!
!CnsStrengthening = [ b: 0:b | d: 0:d | g: 0:g | j: 0:j | l: 0:l | ļ: 0:ļ | m: 0:m | ņ: 0:ņ | r: 0:r | ŗ: 0:ŗ | v: 0:v | z: 0:z | ž: 0:ž ];


!! # Rule section
Rules

!! ## Vowel rules

!! ### Shortening in first syllable


!! 
"ǟ:ä in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ǟ:ä <=> # Cns* _ ( i ) Cns Cns:* (Vow:) [ %^VowShIn1:0 ] (%^A2ÕIn2:) [ %> | # ] ;
!!€# kǟnga%^VowShIn1%^A2ÕIn2
!!€0 kängõ00
        # Cns* _ ( u: ) Cns Cns:* (Vow:) %^VowsSh1: ;

"ā:a in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ā:a <=> # Cns* _  ( i ) Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 | %^VowShIn1:0 ] ;
!!€# āļdža%^VowShIn1%^A2ÕIn2
!!€0 aļdžõ00
     # Cns* _ ( i ) Cns:+ Vow: %^PenVV2V: ;
!!€# āita%^PenVV2V%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 ait000%>õ


"ȱ:ȯ"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ȱ:ȯ <=> # Cns* _ Cns:+ (Vow:) %^VowShIn1: ;
!!€# vȱntsa%^VowShIn1%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 vȯnts0000õ

"ā:ī in second syllable plural"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ā:ī <=>  _ [Dummy: - %^VowsRM:]* %^Vow2Iin2: ; 
!# Cns* Vow [ ʼ: | :ʼ ] [ :Cns | Cns: ] _ (%^ConsSh:) %^Vow2Iin2: ;
!!€# rikkā%^ConsSh%^Vow2Iin2>di
!!€# rik0ī000di

"ū:ī in second syllable plural"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:ī <=>  _ ( %^ConsSh: ) %^Vow2Iin2: ;
!!€# ruzū%^Vow2Iin2>di
!!€# ruzī000di

"a:i in second syllable plural"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
a:i <=>  _ ( %^ConsSh: |%^VowsSh1: %^PalatalizeLeft: ) %^Vow2Iin2: ; 
!!€# āita%^Vow2Iin2>di
!!€# āiti00di

"ǭ:a in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ǭ:a <=> # Cns* _  ( i: ) :Cns+ Vow: [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 ]  ;
        # Cns* _  Cns %{XC%}: %^VowsSh1:0 ;

"ē:e in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ē:e <=> # Cns* _  ( :i ) :Cns+ Vow: [ %^VowsShI1:0 | %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 ] ;
!# Cns* _  ( :i ) :Cns+ Vow: %^Stress1to2:0  ;
 # Cns* _  ( :i ) :Cns+ Vow: Cns [ %^VowsShI1:0 | %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 ] ;

"ū:u in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:u <=> # Cns* _  ( i ) Cns:+ Vow: [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 ]  ;

"ū:ȯ in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:ȯ <=> # Cns* _   o:  Cns:+ (0:Cns) (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 (%^PalatalizeLeft:)]  ;
!!€# pūol0a%^Stress1to2%^ConsL
!!€0 pȯ0llõ00
!!€# pūoga%^VowsSh1%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 pȯig00000õ


"ī:i in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ī:i <=> # Cns* _  ( i | e ) Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 ]  ;
      # Cns* _ Vow:* Cns:+ (0:Cns|%{XC%}:) (Vow:) %^VowShIn1:0 (%^A2ÕIn2:0) ; 
!!€# tīer0a%^VowShIn1%^A2ÕIn2
!!€0 tierrõ00

"ȭ:õ in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ȭ:õ <=> # Cns* _  ( i | u: ) Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 ]  ;
!!€# mȭuka%^VowsSh1%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 mõuk0000õ

"ō:o in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ō:o <=> # Cns* _  ( i | 0:u ) Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsSh1:0 | %^VowsShU1: ]  ;

!! lengthen vowels

"e:ē in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
e:ē <=> # Cns* _  ( i: ) :Cns+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# leiba%^VowsLI1%>st
!!€0 lē0ba00st
        # Cns* _   i: %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# tei%^VowsLI1%>ḑi
!!€0 tē000ḑi

"u:ū in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
u:ū <=> # Cns* _  ( i: | ʼ: | :ʼ ) :Cns+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# ul%^VowsLI1>õd
!!€0 ūl00õd


"õ:ȭ in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
õ:ȭ <=> # Cns* _  ( u: ) :Cns+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;

"ȯ:ū in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ȯ:ū <=> # Cns* _  0: i:  Cns:+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0  ;

"ä:ǟ in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ä:ǟ <=> # Cns:* _  ( u: ) Cns:+ (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;

"0:i after shortened vowel or diphthong"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
0:i <=> # Cns* [ ē: | ū: o: ] _ :Cns+ Vow: (Cns:) %^VowsShI1:0 ;
         _ e ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) Cns: %^PreI: ;
!!€# v0eʼd%^PreI
!!€0 vieʼd0

"0:u after shortened vowel or diphthong"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
0:u <=> # Cns* [ ō: ] _ Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 | %^VowsShU1: ] ;

"0:o after shortened vowel or diphthong"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
0:o <=> # Cns*  ȯ: _ (i:) Cns:+ (Vow:) [ %^VowsLI1:0 ] ;

!! ### VOWEL LENGTHENING

"a:ǭ in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
a:ǭ <=> _ :Cns+ %^VowsL1aToǭ:0 ;
!!€# tam%^VowsL1aToǭõd
!!€0 tǭm0õd

"a:ā in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
a:ā <=> _ [i [d|g |k|l| m |n|s| z] | :Cns+ ] (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# kand%^VowsLI1õd
!!€0 kāndõd

"i:ī in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
i:ī <=> Cns _ Cns:+  (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# niŗț%^VowsLI1%>õ
!!€0 nīŗț00õ
   _ e (ʼ:) Cns: %^VowsLI1:0 ;

"o:ō in first syllable"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
o:ō <=> _ [i g | (u:) :Cns+] (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# ouki%^VowsLI1z
!!€0 ō0ki0z

"o:i"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 o:i <=> ū: _ g (a:) %^VowsSh1: %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!€# pūog%^VowsSh1%^PalatalizeLeft%>õ
!!€0 pȯig0000õ

!! LOWER VOWELS
"ī:ē in tīe 15"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ī:ē <=> _ (ʼ:) Vow:  %^LowerVows: ;
!!€# tīʼe%^LowerVows%^StodRM%^VowsRM%>šti
!!€0 tē000000šti
 # Cns* _ (ʼ:) ( e: ) Cns: %^ĪE2Ē: ;
! requires 0:e
!!€0 kīel%^ĪE2Ē%^PalatalizeLeft
!!€# kē0ļ00

!! Destressing in second syllable
"ā:õ "
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ā:õ <=>  _ ( %^ConsL: ) %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> ] ;
        _ ( %^ConsL: ) %^LongV2Õin2: ;
!!€# käp0ā%^ConsL%^LongV2Õin2
!!€0 käppõ00
     # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns (0:Cns)| Cns+ ] _ z: %^Stress2to1:0  ;
!# Cns* Vow ( 0: ) :Cns+ _ %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> ] ;
!!€  rik0āz%^Stress2to1%^ConsRM
!!€  rikkõ000

"a:õ "
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
a:õ <=>  _ ( %^ConsL:0 ) [ %^Stress2to1:0 | %^VowsShU1: ] [ # | %> ] ;
     # Cns* [ Vow: | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns (0:Cns)| Cns+ ] _ [ %^Stress1to2:0  (%^ConsL:) | (%^VowShIn1:) %^A2ÕIn2: ] [ # | %> ]  ;
!!€# tīer0a%^VowShIn1%^A2ÕIn2
!!€0 tierrõ00

"ū:õ "
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:õ <=> # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> ] ;

"õ:i"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 õ:i <=> [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ [ n: | l: | z: ] %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
! # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ [ n: | l: | z: ] %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
         [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ r %^VowsõToi:0  ;
!         # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ :Cns+ _ r %^VowsõToi:0  ;
!!€# ǭʼrõn%^PalatalizeLeft
!!€0 ǭʼriņ0
!!€# nȭŗkõz%^PalatalizeLeft%>ist
!!€0 nȭŗkiz00ist


!! VOWEL LOSS

"ā:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ā:0 <=> _ Dummy:* %^VowsRM:0  ;
!# Cns*  [Vow: | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ [ ( %^StodRM:0 ) ( %^Stress2to1:0 | %^Stress1to2: | %^ConsSh: |%^PalatalizeLeft:) %^VowsRM:0 | %^VowsShI1:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^ConsL:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %^ConsRM:0 ] [ # | %> ] ;
!!€# aʼmmā%^PalatalizeLeft%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ži
!!€0 äʼm000000ži
!!€# aʼmā%^PalatalizeLeft%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ḑi
!!€# ä0m00000ḑi
!!€# daʼdzā%^Stress1to2%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 daʼdz0000õ

! # Cns* Vow ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ [ ( %^StodRM:0 ) ( %^Stress2to1:0 ) %^VowsRM:0 | %^VowsShI1:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^ConsL:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %^ConsRM:0 ] [ # | %> ] ;
       # Cns* [ Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ Cns: %^StodRM: %^VowsRM: %^ConsRM: ;
!!€# maʼigāz%^StodRM%^VowsRM%^ConsRM>īst
!!€0 ma0ig000000īst

"ū:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ū:0 <=>  _ Dummy:* %^VowsRM:0 ;
! # Cns* [Vow | ʼ: | :ʼ ]+ [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ [ ( %^StodRM:0 ) ( %^Stress2to1:0 ) %^VowsRM:0 | %^VowsShI1:0 %^VowsRM:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %^ConsRM:0 ] [ # | %> ] ;
    # Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ Cns  %^Tense:0  ;
!#Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %^ConsRM:0 %> d: 

"ī:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ī:0 <=>  _ Dummy:* %^VowsRM: ;
    # Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) [ Cns: | :Cns ]+ _ Cns  %^Tense:0  ;
    # Cns* _ e %> i ;
!!€# sīe%>i
!!€# s0e0i
